da: Stil for håndledsrem: Aftagelig strop; Strop med dobbelt omvikling; Elastisk strop; Strop med enkelt omvikling; Stropløs; Andet
ru: Стиль ремешка на запястье: Съемный ремешок; Ремешок в два оборота; Эластичный ремешок; Ремешок в один оборот; Без ремешка; Другое
ja: リストストラップスタイル: 取り外し可能なストラップ; 2 重巻きストラップ; 伸縮性ストラップ; 1 重巻きストラップ; ストラップなし; その他
ro-RO: Stil al curelei pentru încheietură: Curea detașabilă; Curea cu înfășurare dublă; Curea elastică; Curea cu înfășurare simplă; Fără curea; Altele
hr-HR: Stil remena za zapešće: Odvojiva traka; Dvostruka traka; Elastična traka; Jednostruka traka; Bez trake; Ostalo
fi: Rannehihnan tyyli: Irrotettava hihna; Kaksinkertainen hihna; Joustava hihna; Yksinkertainen hihna; Hihnaton; Muu
pl: Styl paska na nadgarstek: Odpinany pasek; Pasek z podwójnym oplotem; Elastyczny pasek; Pasek z pojedynczym oplotem; Bez paska; Inne
nl: Polsbandstijl: Afneembaar bandje; Bandje met dubbele wikkeling; Elastisch bandje; Bandje met enkele wikkeling; Zonder bandje; Overig
zh-CN: 腕带样式: 可拆卸腕带; 双圈腕带; 弹性腕带; 单圈腕带; 无带; 其他
es: Estilo de correa para muñeca: Correa desmontable; Correa de doble vuelta; Correa elástica; Correa de una vuelta; Sin correa; Otro
ko: 손목 스트랩 스타일: 탈부착형 스트랩; 더블 랩 스트랩; 탄성 스트랩; 싱글 랩 스트랩; 끈 없음; 기타
lt-LT: Riešo dirželio stilius: Nuimamas dirželis; Dvigubo apsukimo dirželis; Elastinis dirželis; Vieno apsukimo dirželis; Be dirželio; Kita
en: Wrist strap style: Detachable strap; Double wrap strap; Elastic strap; Single wrap strap; Strapless; Other
sv: Modell av handledsrem: Avtagbar rem; Dubbelvirad rem; Elastisk rem; Enkelvirad rem; Utan rem; Övrigt
sk-SK: Štýl popruhov na zápästie: Odnímateľný remienok; Dvojitý ovinovací remienok; Elastický remienok; Jednoduchý ovinovací remienok; Bez remienka; Iné
nb: Stil for håndleddsstropp: Avtakbar stropp; Dobbel stropp; Elastisk stropp; Stropp med enkelt omslag; Stroppeløs; Annet
vi: Kiểu dáng dây đeo cổ tay: Dây đeo có thể tháo rời; Dây quấn đôi; Dây co giãn; Dây quấn đơn; Không dây; Khác
zh-TW: 腕帶樣式: 可拆卸綁帶; 雙圈纏繞綁帶; 彈性綁帶; 單圈纏繞綁帶; 無綁帶; 其他
th: รูปแบบสายรัดข้อมือ: สายถอดได้; สายพันสองรอบ; สายยางยืด; สายพันรอบเดียว; ไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
hu: Csuklópánt stílusa: Levehető pánt; Duplán tekerhető pánt; Elasztikus pánt; Szimplán tekerhető pánt; Pánt nélküli; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de tira para o pulso: Alça amovível; Alça de volta dupla; Alça elástica; Alça de volta simples; Sem alças; Outro
it: Stile del cinturino da polso: Cinturino staccabile; Cinturino a doppio giro; Cinturino elastico; Cinturino a giro singolo; Senza cinturino; Altro
el: Στυλ λουριού καρπού: Αποσπώμενο λουράκι; Λουράκι διπλού τυλίγματος; Ελαστικό λουράκι; Λουράκι μονού τυλίγματος; Χωρίς λουράκι; Άλλο
fr: Modèle à bracelet: Sangle détachable; Sangle double tour; Sangle élastique; Sangle simple tour; Sans sangle; Autre
de: Art des Handgelenkbands: Abnehmbarer Riemen; Doppelt gewickelter Riemen; Elastischer Riemen; Einfach gewickelter Riemen; Ohne Riemen; Sonstige
sl-SI: Stil zapestnega paščka: Snemljiv pašček; Pašček z dvojnim ovijanjem; Elastičen pašček; Pašček z enojnim ovijanjem; Brez paščka; Drugo
cs: Styl pásku na zápěstí: Odnímatelný popruh; Dvojitý popruh; Elastický popruh; Jednoduchý popruh; Bez popruhu; Jiné
pt-BR: Modelo com alça para pulso: Alça removível; Alça de volta dupla; Alça elástica; Alça de volta única; Sem alça; Outros
tr: Bilek kayışı stili: Çıkarılabilir kayış; Çift dolamalı kayış; Elastik kayış; Tek dolamalı kayış; Kayışsız; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил на каишката за китка: Подвижна каишка; Каишка с двойно увиване; Еластична каишка; Каишка с единично увиване; Без каишка; Други